Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 4
ELECTIONS

32-11-401. Elections.

Wherever in this article 11 an election is permitted or required, the election may be held independently at a special election held and conducted under article 13.5 of title 1 or may be held in coordination with the clerk and recorders of counties included within the district under articles 1 to 13 of title 1.

If an election is held in coordination with the clerk and recorders of counties included within the district, the district shall pay the district's costs of conducting a nonpartisan election in accordance with section 1-7-116 (2).

Source:

L. 69:

p. 762, § 36.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-36.

L. 70:

p. 299, § 119.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1626, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 917, § 180, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-025), ch. 22, p. 275, § 2, effective March 7.

32-11-402. Election resolution.

The board shall call any election by resolution.

The resolution shall recite the objects and purposes of the election, the date upon which the election shall be held, and the form of the ballot and shall designate an election official to conduct the election.

to (5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 917, § 181, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 762, § 37.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-37.

L. 70:

p. 299, § 120.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 917, § 181, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-025), ch. 22, p. 275, § 3, effective March 7.

32-11-403. Conduct of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 763, § 38.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-38.

L. 70:

pp. 299, 300, §§ 121, 122.

L. 71:

p. 964, §§ 14, 15.

L. 77:

(6) amended, p. 234, § 11, effective June 19; (4) and (10) amended, p. 288, § 63, effective June 29; (9) amended, p. 1515, § 83, effective July 15.

L. 80:

(4) and (10) amended, p. 416, § 32, effective February 21.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-11-404. Notice of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 764, § 39.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-39.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed. p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-11-405. Polling places. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 764, § 40.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-40.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-11-406. Election supplies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 764, § 41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-41.

L. 70:

p. 300, § 123.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1515, § 84, effective July 15.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.

32-11-407. Election returns. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 765, § 42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-42.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 924, § 198, effective January 1, 1993.